Utah statutes.
39-6-20.   Military judge -- Qualifications -- Designation for detail.
(1)  The authority convening a military court shall, subject to regulations
made by the governor, detail a military judge to preside over each open
session of the court.
(2)  A military judge shall be:
(a)  a commissioned officer;
(b)  a member of the Utah State Bar;
(c)  a member of the bar of a federal court; and
(d)  certified as qualified for this duty by the state judge advocate.
(3) (a)  The military judge of a military court shall be designated by the
state judge advocate or the SJA's designee for detail by the convening
authority.
(b)  Unless the military court was convened by the governor, neither the
adjutant general nor the adjutant general's staff may prepare or review any
report concerning the effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency of the detailed
military judge that relates to the judge's performance of duty as a military
judge.
(4)  A person is not eligible to act as a military judge in a case if the
person:
(a)  is the accuser;
(b)  is a witness in the case;
(c)  has acted as investigating officer; or
(d)  is a counsel in the same case.
(5)  The military judge of a court may not:
(a)  consult with the members of the court, except in the presence of the
accused, trial counsel, and defense counsel; or
(b)  vote with the members of the court.
